2025.5.2 
유투브 수업 리스트
with [크롬 플러그인 Transcript Youtube]
https://youtu.be/gx1DHHrxE6k?si=51k_nFpRXEQb3MvQ
    (54) Why Restaurant Chains Are Making A Comeback | CNBC Marathon - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=gx1DHHrxE6k
    
    (00:00) Mcdonald's is rolling out a special $5 value menu next month. Wendy's and Burger King both launch $5 value meals of their own. Restaurants are hoping to win back customers who have been turned off by high prices and turn to grocery stores for meals. Why are people going back to Chili's all of a sudden? I
    (00:14) don't get it. This is called the Triple Dipper. Chili's estimates that nearly 40% of its growth this past quarter came from these mozzarella sticks going viral on TikTok. You cannot tell me that's the most insane cheese pull you've ever seen. Across fast food chains, chicken has been a hit, especially this year.
    (00:34) What began as a buffalo chicken wing restaurant in 1994, in Texas, has now grown to more than 2,000 restaurants nationwide. The company says that this growth was driven by increased transactions. I would say depending on the day, we will receive typically around 300, 400 transactions. We weren't always the top of
    (00:55) the tier. And over the last two years we've just seen such a turnaround. Why are people going back to Chili's all of a sudden? I don't get it. Chili's Grill & Bar is an anomaly in the restaurant space right now. Can I get a thousand islands please? Yes . At locations that have been open for more than a year,
    (01:30) Chili's fourth quarter sales increased nearly 15% compared to the same time period in 2023. In a segment that is seen declining traffic and flat sales is a tremendous accomplishment, and I think it speaks to how much what they did really resonates with today's consumer. Chili's parent company, Brinker International,
    (01:54) reported its total revenue surpassing $4.4 billion in fiscal 2024. That's an all time high for the company. Well, the brand has experienced some internet virality over the past few months, its current success, didn't happen overnight. It's actually been at this turnaround for now, it's a little over two
    (02:11) years, and we just started with the fundamentals of casual dining. So that sounds easy. It sounds kind of a little bit of motherhood and apple pie. But the reality is it's really, really difficult to execute. So how did Chili's do it, and can they keep it up? Brinker International owns Chili's and Maggiano's
    (02:37) Little Italy. Chili's accounts for more than 85% of its business. Its growth was pioneered by the founder of casual dining, Norman Brinker, who acquired the chain in 1983. There is a long term history with Chili's that goes back to the Norman Brinker days. A lot of pride in having fun at the restaurant operations
    (02:58) led culture, who was very much a youthful brand that was differentiated from grill and bar peers. The chain grew quickly, reaching a peak store count of over 1,300 U.S . locations by 2008, and Brinker International's annual revenue had exceeded $4 billion. The recession hit the restaurant sector hard,
    (03:16) especially casual dining, as consumers increasingly opted to eat meals at home. Chili's, has shut down stores almost every year since. That brand slowly lost its way, often pursuing things that were outside the brand parameters. Extending the menu too far for example. Why did you feel the need to narrow the offerings of it?
    (03:38) Yeah, you know, I think in legacy brands, it typically, the way to try to get short term sales growth is you add more items, and that will work in the short term, but it makes it very difficult for the restaurant teams to be able to execute, unless the business is growing fast enough where they can afford more labor,
    (03:52) it's very hard to run that menu. And so that's what we had. Guys have a start out to 84. It would make our lives difficult on a Friday, Saturday night when we're really busy and each zone in the kitchen is trying to pump out food as fast as possible and try to make a quality dish. And sometimes that quality suffered.
    (04:11) There was also a misguided focus placed on takeout and delivery. After falling from its highs in 2007, Brinker's revenue remained relatively stagnant in the decade leading up to the pandemic. Even the three years preceding Covid, the profitability of the business had gotten worse, partly because they were
    (04:28) pursuing off premise businesses. Ultimately, they took the money out of the advertising budget and put it into third party delivery initiatives and even virtual brands to reach the consumer with the kitchens and the assets that they had. Well those initiatives, hurt the on premise business. That all changed when CEO
    (04:49) Kevin Hochman stepped in, in 2022. Brinker International's 2024 revenue surpassed the highs it saw in the early 2000s. What's changed, why are Americans going back to Chili's? What's happening is one, the actual experience is a whole lot better. But then two, you know, our marketing team has done a great job of
    (05:12) getting back into the called the zeitgeist or being relevant again. We weren't always the top of the tier, and over the last two years we've just seen such a turnaround. You know, from the support we get from, you know, our bosses to the technology, the culinary innovations, all of those things. It made Chili's fun
    (05:33) again. Over the past two fiscal years, Chili's has grown its average sales per restaurant by about $440,000. That's 14% more than what it was before, in the same time period, Hochman says the menu has shrunk more than 20%. And typically you don't get rid of menu items because you're going to lose sales.
    (05:52) We got rid of almost a quarter of our menu, right? And I'm happy to say that that simplification has worked. We have grown the business, we have improved guest metrics. And that's why we're beating the industry pretty significantly right now. In the 2024 fiscal year, Brinker International has invested $200 million in
    (06:07) capital expenditure. That means it was investing heavily in repairs, maintenance, and improving its restaurants overall. Brinker International share price is up around 60% since the start of 2024. But despite strong sales, the company did miss Wall Street's expectations for earnings in its most recent
    (06:25) quarter. We went and put more labor into the restaurants, which is expensive. We accelerated facility improvements that we probably would have done next year, and we'll pull them into this year. Wall Street didn't anticipate us making those additional investments to try to hold on to more of that traffic.
    (06:39) And that was the change in expectations versus what they were seeing, and what we knew. Traffic spiked by about 6% in Chili's most recent quarter compared to the same time period of last year. Hey, yo, Chili's, what? Part of that is due to due to recent success with social media. You hear 5% traffic growth
    (06:56) and you're like, is that that much? Well, it doesn't happen throughout the day. It happens during peak times. So, that could be, you know, in some cases it could be 20, 30% more guests coming in, right? And then spread across the day, it's 5%. So, you really got to staff up. If you don't want lines and you want to have a
    (07:09) good experience. To keep up, Brinker has spent an additional $5 million on staffing. Another 15 to $20 million of labor is planned for 2025. This is called the Triple Dipper, Chili's estimates that nearly 40% of its growth this past quarter came from these mozzarella sticks going viral on TikTok. You cannot tell me that's
    (07:31) the most insane cheese pull you've ever seen. Every time a customer orders that, I'm like, oh, you saw it on TikTok, and they're like, yeah, it's hilarious. Within a week, you know what we were ordering in order to fulfill those orders tripled in some restaurants, even probably even more so. We were, we were bringing in so
    (07:50) many mozzarella planks that, you know, it was hard to store them all, but you didn't have to because they were going out just as quickly as they were coming in. The chain estimates that the other 60% of sales growth came from its $10.99 Big Smasher meal, meaning it's capitalizing on one of the most important consumer pain
    (08:07) points at the current time: value. The inflation rate of limited service dining, think food you order at the counter, has outpaced that of sit down restaurants for all of 2023 and even the first quarter of 2024. And Chili's saw an opportunity precisely there. How is this Chili's three for me only $10.99,
    (08:33) when fast food is so expensive? It could be because we don't have to pay for any mascots. Please. Certainly, they've had decent success over the last couple of years, but this really now has resonated with consumers in a way that I haven't seen a full service promotion resonate in quite some time. We're a nostalgic brand that
    (08:56) brings people in, and they've leaned into that and they've leaned into the socials, they've leaned into the advertising, and their innovations, their investments are working and our traffic is up. Our sales are up. Brinker spent $14 million more on advertising in its fiscal fourth quarter of 2024, compared to the same
    (09:15) time last year. Applebee's has pushed a similar strategy, but with less success. Its same -store sales have been in the negative every quarter over the past year, while Chili's have been in the positive. You order DoorDash nowadays or you know, delivery, and you might pay $17, $18 for a value meal of
    (09:35) sorts from a fast food place, and you're not getting a fraction of what we're offering with Chili's. As casual dining is marketing itself as an alternative to fast food. Even CEO of Darden Restaurants, which owns chains like Olive Garden and Longhorn Steakhouse, said certain casual dining chains are taking customers
    (09:54) from fast food competitors. Still, though, from a consumer spending perspective, over the past decade, limited-service spending has increased as a percentage of overall sales, while full-service dining has decreased. Limited-service, which includes fast food, and fast casual, i.e. upscale fast food.
    (10:13) A little bit higher experience, but we bucket it all together in limited-service has outperformed. Traffic has been good. It's slowed as everything else has. Fast food chains are more exposed to the lower income consumer, who have pulled back with certain discretionary spending. Casual dining has more of a
    (10:32) percentage of consumers that are over $100,000 in income. And that exposure, that relative exposure, has been good for them if they have the right value. However, when comparing a chain like Chili's to McDonald's, the scale of the companies must be put into context. Last year, Chile's revenue was around
    (10:49) $3.5 billion, while McDonald's revenue was over $25 billion. Double digit sales growth is simply much harder to come by when you're that big. Plus, the reality is that consumers who frequent fast food chains versus casual dining chains are often coming from different income levels. Because the interest rates
    (11:08) are higher, the wealth effects are less. The long term real wage declines all hurt the under $50,000 cohort. And unfortunately for McDonald's, for example, they have to deal with that way more than Chili's. In addition to the fact that Chili's has played much better in the value realm, and in fact, quite astutely,
    (11:32) Kevin Hochman and team have marketed to that relative value even versus fast food. The real test for Chili's will be sustaining this recent growth for the long haul. Customers need to not only be coming back, but they need to be spending more, too. Full service is not only the traffic conundrum getting
    (11:51) people in the seats, but also then generating margin, and a lot of the higher margin items that are generated by casual dining - alcohol, desserts, appetizers have been the areas that consumers have cut back on. That's important because restaurants often rely on deals to bring people in the door and get them spending
    (12:09) on other things. Value offerings themselves typically aren't generating high margins. At what point does that eat into profit, though? Are you concerned about that as a maybe long term... Well, certainly you have to be concerned with that, because ultimately we have shareholders and we have a great rate of return. You
    (12:29) know, one of the things I'm proud of that the team has been able to do is we have what's called a barbell strategy. So as long as we have items that we can that we can offer for guests that want something a little bit more versus some guests that just want a high price point, and we keep that that mix in balance,
    (12:42) right? We're going to continue to grow profitability. What would you like today, Ryan? So I'll do a split combo. Would you like- 6, 8, 10 or 12? 8, s ounds great. What began as a buffalo chicken wing restaurant in 1994, in Texas, has now grown to more than 2,000 restaurants nationwide. Right now, we're just
    (13:13) dropping some chicken. I love this, out of any other flavor, hot honey. Oh, man, I'll take it. I'll take hot honey more than anything, ever. Mhm. That's the lemon pepper. It's one of their most popular. It's delicious. Since initially going public in 2015, Wingstop stock price is up over 1,100%. Over the past five years,
    (13:35) it's up nearly 300%. And in the past year alone, it's more than doubled. So Wingstop's growth is really unprecedented in the restaurant industry. You know, if I went back to Chipotle in the 2000s, when the brand was emerging, we saw growth almost at Chipotle at Wingstop's levels. But what's different
    (13:52) about Wingstop, is the fact that it's over 2,000 stores. There's no other brand at scale to the growth that Wingstop's doing. The company's systemwide store count reached over 2,300 at the end of June. That's about 1,000 more locations than it had in 2019. Consequently, revenue has more than doubled in that same time
    (14:11) period. On average, our franchisees invest about $500,000 to open a Wingstop, and they're basically getting that entire investment paid back to them in less than two years because the income statement is so strong. With chains like Starbucks and McDonald's facing consumer pullback. How did Wingstop become one
    (14:32) of the hottest restaurant chains in the country? Across fast food chains, chicken has been a hit, especially this year. And with school coming back around, football scaling back up, it's starting to pick up in the morning. They love chicken in the morning. They love chicken in the morning. I love chicken. But
    (14:54) you know, I love chicken in the morning. That's good news for Wingstop, because well, chicken is about all it sells. Its menu also lends itself well to an experiential offering for hanging out with friends or watching a football game. If you're thinking about someone who has to make a decision on where to trim
    (15:13) spending, the likelihood that they're going to give up something that is associated with a social event is much lower than, hey, I'm going to forego my Starbucks coffee this morning. Wingstop is a special occasion. Our frequency over my ten years has really averaged about three times a quarter or once a month,
    (15:34) a low frequency occasion. And we're just now, for the first time, starting to see that tick upwards, which we're pretty excited about. Going beyond just wings has helped drive that uptick. The chicken sandwich wars took off right before the pandemic and as chain after chain vied for market share. Wingstop eventually got in
    (15:53) on the game. The chicken sandwich this was introduced in the middle of 2022. Chicken is a very popular protein with the consumer, particularly fried chicken. And so the ability for Wingstop to offer their chicken sandwich in 11 flavors, you know, really an opportunity for continued utilization . Wingstop has seen an
    (16:13) increase in new guests visiting its locations ever since the chicken sandwich was introduced. And those new customers are visiting more frequently than its traditional wing customer. The company reported same store sales growth, increasing nearly 30% in the U.S . for the second quarter of this year. That means
    (16:28) that the company generated more sales per store compared to last year. The company says that this growth was driven by increased transactions. I would say depending on the day, we will receive typically around 300, 400 transactions. Investors look at same store sales is the key metric for health of restaurant
    (16:48) concept. Wingstop has experienced same-store sales growth for 20 years. The stores themselves require relatively low operational costs. We run a very efficient labor profile. You can run that Wingstop, that's doing on average $2 million. You can run that with as few as four team members in the restaurant. We run in a very
    (17:10) efficient box-on-average about 1,600, 1,700 square feet. And so our occupancy cost where we target B, B- real estate is extremely efficient. So this Wingstop in Neptune, New Jersey opened a few years back. And I initially thought it was a very interesting location choice. It's set off from the main road, across from a grocery
    (17:30) store in the middle of a shopping center. But that's exactly the type of real estate that Wingstop targets. It doesn't need to target prime real estate because last quarter, nearly 70% of its sales came from digital orders, meaning people were not just impulsively stopping by, they were coming here intentionally.
    (17:49) The use occasion or the consumption occasion for Wingstop is the consumer coming to them. And so I don't care if I have to go next to the pet store to pick up my wings, because I'm going there to pick it up. Whereas, like I said, if a McDonald's was in the middle of a strip mall, you lose a lot of those impulse
    (18:09) purchases because it's, you know, there's not a drive-thru. Brand awareness is growing. Franchisees contribute a percentage of sales into the national advertising fund. So as system sales grow, so does ad spend, which nearly doubled from 2021 to 2023. From about five years ago to now. Not a lot of people
    (18:28) know about Wingstop. But not everybody knows about Wingstop. The viral nature of the brand and how it's cropped up so many different times on social media has really helped feed into the, you know, the customer acquisition. H ashtag Wingstop has been tagged in over 150,000 TikTok videos that have garnered millions
    (18:49) of views. The company has leaned heavily into marketing with live sports. It has official partnerships with multiple NBA teams, and its free wing promotions have led to viral moments, with top athletes. Giannis wants the chance to get the QR code to get his free wings. Although the chain saw its U.S. same store sales grow
    (19:10) over 28% last quarter, and beat Wall Street earnings expectations, the stock price has actually fallen more than 10% from the highs that were seen in June. Wingstop is still one of the best performing restaurant stocks. I think as of recent, you've seen a big divergence in the valuations of restaurant stocks.
    (19:31) So, a stock like Wingstop, a stock like Sweetgreen, a stock like Cava, have very premium valuations relative to the overall restaurant space and then other more mature restaurant stocks like McDonald's, like Starbucks, have seen their stocks have their valuation beat down. Take a look at Wingstop stock price. Now look at the
    (19:57) company's earnings per share over the last 12 months. That price to earnings ratio is high. Now take a look at the same valuation, for stocks like McDonald's and Starbucks. Trading at a higher premium, means more volatility in its share price. The rest of the story, though, is really macro, that the consumer base for
    (20:20) Wingstop historically skewed more lower income and on a price per calorie basis. It's just cheaper to go to a quick service drive-thru to get food, relative to a Wingstop. However, Charles says that Wingstop is seeing a shift from a middle to higher income consumer with increased transaction on third party delivery apps.
    (20:38) Plus, unlike its fast food competitors, Wingstop has kept a tight leash on prices. Since 2019, Wingstop has only increased prices by around 15%, while its peers and the quick-service restaurant category fall into the 30 to 40% range. The reason we think quick -service is underperforming Wingstop, is really about
    (20:58) the amount of price that quick -service has taken, and that there is a lot less discipline relative to what Wingstop has done in recent years. In 2021, wing prices soared, so Wingstop pushed chicken thighs instead. To combat this type of volatility going forward, the company changed the way it sourced
    (21:15) its chicken wings. They shifted from a spot where they're just buying whatever the market price is, to negotiating that price for the whole bird. They'll use the parts of the bird they need for their operation, the wing, the breast, etc. and they'll effectively sell the remains to either a soup or pet food company that can
    (21:33) use the remaining part of the bird. And that's allowing us to create predictability. And most importantly, it's minimizing the volatility that our franchisees see on their income statement within their food cost line. In its most recent earnings call, Wingstop raised its store count goal to reach a domestic total of 6,000
    (21:56) locations. That would be about triple its current total and more locations than Kentucky Fried Chicken currently has in the U.S. However, that kind of growth could be a long way out. TD Cowen anticipates the chain to have about 4,000 locations domestically, and 5,000 locations globally, by 2030. You know, I don't think this
    (22:15) is going to be the new Kentucky Fried Chicken or some big chain, but they've got another 2 or 3 years of packing on 250, 300 stores before they start saturating America. The company also says it has room for growth within the world of third party delivery systems. On DoorDash and on Uber Eats, our awareness levels
    (22:34) are still really low. Our delivery channel mix is about 30% today. When we benchmark delivery channel mix to other, more mature, heavy off premise businesses. Think big pizza. Their delivery channel mix is north of 50%, so we see a lot of runway there. Wingstop is still relatively low awareness, even as the broader consumer
    (23:01) is maybe pulling back from spending on food away from home, Wingstop has the opportunity to gain incremental consumers that have never heard of the brand before. Skipworth says that Wingstop has a goal of transitioning entirely to digital ordering. Does that mean, like you would eliminate that face-to-face interaction?
    (23:20) And it would be more of just kind of a pickup model, is that the goal? We're not holding chicken that's been previously cooked. We're making it to order. And on average it takes about 18 minutes to get your order at a Wingstop. So, training guests to order ahead, through our digital platform. It's actually just
    (23:38) a better guest experience. But then for our perspective, we tend to see a higher average check. The average annual sales per store is over $2 million, and the company now aims to make that $3 million. About 98% of Wingstop's are franchises. And as we grow our average sales-per-restaurant, it's continuing to make
    (24:01) those income statements for our franchisees better. And that's going to make them want to open more Wingstops. And that's how I think we'll continue to be able to scale Wingstop into what our overall vision is, is to become a top ten global restaurant brand. In order to be a top ten restaurant brand, you're
    (24:19) talking about roughly about $10 billion in scale. And so this is an ambition that getting to $18 billion based on their long term targets, will put themselves pretty solidly there. And just to give you some you some perspective, the $18 billion target puts them right now in between Chick-fil-A and Taco Bell,
    (24:36) in terms of what that would mean for today. With fast food customers revolting over higher prices, chains like McDonald's, Burger King and Wendy's are bringing back the value meal. Consumers are continuing to collide with companies over higher prices. Mcdonald's is rolling out a special $5 value menu next
    (25:07) month. Wendy's and Burger King both launch $5 value meals of their own. Restaurants are hoping to win back customers, who have been turned off by high prices and turned to grocery stores for meals. Mcdonald's, Taco Bell, Burger King and Wendy's have unveiled or revived meal deals with a $5 or less price tag.
    (25:22) Find out which extra value meal is $2.99. Go to your local McDonald's. It's a familiar playbook that fast food chains have used in the past, and the competition has sparked what some are calling the value menu war. Causing this, you know. quote, "war," could actually be helpful for them, and it might actually help
    (25:37) the entire fast food industry. And this has always been an industry where value is critically important. We stepped away from that or backed away from that a little bit during the pandemic and in the years subsequent, because spending was robust, because there was a lot of inflation in the commodity complex.
    (25:53) But now, you know, we're seeing what I would characterize as a little bit more of a return to normal. So what has led to the revival of the value menu, and are lower prices here to stay? With the price of fast food skyrocketing, cash strapped consumers have pulled back on their restaurant spend. You go back to where we were
    (26:16) in 2019, our costs in the U.S . have gone up 40%, in our restaurants. Since '19? Since 2019, costs are up 40%, and- Prices are, and prices are up? Pricing, pricing is up correspondingly. As of August 2024, prices for food away from home rose over 27% since 2019. In the U.S., McDonald's same-store sales
    (26:38) fell 0.7% in the second quarter of 2024, compared to the previous year, the first time domestic same-store sales have fallen since 2020. Other chains felt the same pressures in the U.S . In the second quarter of 2024, Burger King saw same-store sales decline by 0.1%, and KFC's fell 5% compared to the previous
    (26:57) year. Higher wages have also been a factor. Labor costs in states like California and New York further pinched tight margins. Well, I would consider the $5 menu sort of chapter one of a multi chapter value playbook that we're going to be writing. And that is continued through the end of August. Mcdonald's has said it's
    (27:17) seeing traffic increase as a result, and investors are buying in. The company's stock has been moving up since reporting earnings in late July. Taco Bell led the value menu wars launching its cravings menu back in January. Value is working for them, but it's really, again, to quote McDonald's, "it's a
    (27:34) knife fight out there." The value meals are only an entry point to customers to return, and potentially buy more items not found on the discounted menu. Fast food typically does better during economic downturns, but the sharp increase in prices over the years have made fast food meals a luxury. But value menus can
    (27:50) be tough on franchisees, because simply lowering the prices will equate to less profit. A McDonald's franchisees advocacy group wrote in a letter obtained by CNBC to the chain, saying, "the fact remains that in order to provide the consumer with more affordable options, they must be affordable to the owner/operators."
    (28:08) The discount pricing may be a boon for customers, but not so much for franchisees. Franchisees tried to push back against the value menu rollout, citing reduced costs would further hurt their already tight profit margins. Well, you know, McDonald's is a big family and it has been around for 60 years,
    (28:23) it's been, it's prided itself its success on this three-legged stool between suppliers, the brand, and of course, the vital franchisees. And so in every big family, you have disagreements. But this debate, this internal debate, has yielded a great result for the brand. And that is us being in the forefront of value.
    (28:41) Franchisees have recognized the fact that they voted to continue it, is recognized that the vast majority of franchisees can make money on these meal bundles, and in particular, are seeing incremental transactions, incremental sales from that. In addition, they're looking at other value constructs that are being more of a
    (28:59) permanent solution. So, there's a lot of gates to go through here. So whether it's buy one, get one for a dollar, or for five, they need to find a value solution here in the near term. Mcdonald's originally announced its value menu would be seasonal, lasting only a month. It later decided to extend the deals.
    (29:17) Analysts in the street alike expect these deals to remain in some form far longer, to continue to attract the value driven consumer. We are working with the franchisees in the U.S . to get a broader value construct in place. And so what we're working on right now with the franchisees is, what's next? I consider the
    (29:33) $5 meal a bridge value program, and then what we'll be doing is putting in place a more permanent value program, much like we had previously. Some restaurant analysts expect the value menus to slowly disappear as they normally do, but in their place will remain meal deals like Wendy's popular for for
    (29:50) four or Taco Bell's Cravings box. You know, it's just going to be a consistent battle for market share. I wouldn't expect dramatic changes in results from Q2 to Q3 just given the demand environment. And so what we're really going to be looking for is which restaurants, which companies can resonate most with,
    (30:08) with consumers and therefore outpace the rest of the industry.

https://youtu.be/ojNm2TxqfN4?si=kbDI7bCB52r5j0To
    Why are there millions of empty houses in Japan? - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ojNm2TxqfN4
    
    (00:00) Hello, I'm Lucy Hockings. From the BBC  World Service, this is The Global Story. In Japan, the number of abandoned homes is at an  all-time high. Nine million properties sit empty,   blighting city streets and turning some  rural communities into ghost towns. So   what do these crumbling houses say about  Japan's existential crisis and its aging,  
    (00:26) shrinking population? And could  a new breed of homeowners, young,   foreign and eager for a bargain,  help to solve the problem? With me today is our Tokyo correspondent,  Shaimaa Khalil. Hi, Shaimaa, how are you?  I'm good, I m good. It's so  good to speak to you, Lucy.  Shaimaa, lovely to see you. Now, if I'm out  and about in a big city in like Tokyo or  
    (00:57) Osaka or Kyoto or even on the countryside, am  I going to see some of these abandoned homes?  Yes, and some of them are more obvious than  others. So if you're in the countryside,   for example, there are homes where nature has  pretty much taken over. So that's a very obvious   sign of an abandoned home. I think here In Tokyo,  for example, there are also obvious older ones,  
    (01:18) but if you're like me and you're a big, avid home  programmes fan and you walk around looking at   houses and wondering how people live inside them, some will be more obvious to you. And then   others are just so deceptive. You walk  around and they look perfectly normal,   but you find out from a broker or real estate  agent or those who bought them that they've  
    (01:40) been abandoned for years and years and years.  So some are more obvious than others, for sure.  And the obvious ones, it's obvious  because they're decaying and decrepit   or they have sort of, you know, foliage  growing out of them. How can you tell?  Exactly. They're in really bad, they're in a  really bad state. They're pretty much falling  
    (02:00) apart. Yeah, so sometimes you just, you can  tell by the state of it that it's, you know,   it's a wooden, very traditional-looking Japanese  home that has seen better days in the middle   of a main street where there are many other  buildings around it. And you could tell that   it's been abandoned for many years. Is this generally, though, Shaimaa,  
    (02:21) seen as a more rural issue? Japan is really suffering   when it comes to urbanisation. And there are  villages that are literally dying out. You know,   for example, there's this remarkable story of  a village called Nagoro. It's literally just a,   you know, 20-something people, a couple  dozen people. And what they've done,  
    (02:40) they've made human-sized dolls to replace people  and just put them around the village in schools   and bus stops in different areas. And while on  the face of it, it's a cute and innovative idea,   it's actually quite unsettling because you can  see that it's literally running out of people. The   majority of the abandoned homes are in villages. However, there are actually more abandoned  
    (03:01) homes in cities here in Tokyo even, more than I  imagined and I've been taken to a couple of them.  Do the Japanese have a word for  these abandoned homes, Shaimaa?  Yes, Akiyas. It's called Akiya. Essentially,  it means empty home, but right now it's used   interchangeably with abandoned homes as well,  homes that have been empty for many, many years. 
    (03:23) How did it get to this  point? Why are there so many?  If you're sitting anywhere in the world right  now where there is a housing problem where   young people are finding it very, very  difficult to get on the property market,   to actually think there's a place in the world  where there are nine million homes that are empty,  
    (03:37) ready for someone to occupy them, it's  quite, I still try to get my head around it,   but essentially it's an aging population, It's a  shrinking population. More people are dying than   there are people being born here. Combine that  with people leaving villages and coming to the   city, so the urbanisation, and you get those  villages of people dying out, of homes that  
    (04:00) are not worth much, that are just left abandoned. So for these Akiyas, it's not so much a problem   of too many houses, it's a problem of not  enough people. But Japan's not the only   country experiencing this Shaimaa. What about  South Korea? I mean, there are neighbouring   countries with low birth rates as well.  Why are the Akiyas a big issue in Japan? 
    (04:20) I think there are a couple of reasons. One is  cultural. I think the majority of Japanese people   tend to want to live in brand new homes. This is a  country that has many, many earthquakes, you know,   with different strengths. But let's just say there  are homes that get affected by earthquakes or get  
    (04:37) destroyed by earthquakes. Instead of renovating,  people would prefer to just build anew. So   that's one thing. I think economically as well,  there is a depreciation in the value of homes,   unlike the West and unlike anywhere else in the  world, actually. And so you have this picture in   Japan where homes are not worth much, people  who live in them and then die, and they leave  
    (05:00) them to family members, and everything about that  house then is more costly than it is profitable   because it costs money to empty it, putting it on  the market, trying to sell it, all the paperwork   that comes with that, it just becomes not worth  it for family members. So it becomes cheaper   for people just to leave them abandoned,  and that's why you get that large number. 
    (05:22) And presumably, Shaimaa, if you're  leaving your home to the next generation,   and there isn't anyone to leave it to,  there's no heirs, what do you do with it?  This is a country that suffers, or that is  suffering with a phenomenon of 'lonely deaths',   of people who die alone and then  they don't have family members,  
    (05:38) so people don't claim their remains for  example. So they don't claim their remains,   they're not going to claim their homes. So it's  almost like the homes die when the people die.  It must have been interesting as well just the  whole culture of older homes Shaimaa, living   in London everyone wants to live in an historic  property and yet in Japan it's the exact opposite? 
    (05:59) Yeah it's a completely different culture,  it's a completely different ballgame. The   fact that a value of a home is how new it is,  how structurally robust it is and that comes   from newer homes and so yeah the concept of  older homes here is not as valued or is not as   romanticised, if you will, as it is in the West. One thing that is the same all over the world, the  
    (06:22) West, and it sounds like Japan, too, is that young  people don't want to go and live in the country.  That is very, very true. And I think that's one  thing that you see more acutely here in Japan,   in rural areas is that when you go, you can see  them shrinking. I think the concept on its own of  
    (06:38) an empty home seems benign, but actually it's not  because if you're a village that's emptying out,   it's almost like you're going extinct because  it becomes a ghost town and it becomes more   off-putting the emptier it is and it becomes less  of a good option for a young family to go live in   an area that's emptying out. Why do the local councils  
    (07:01) not just knock these homes down? When you knock them down, you need   permissions from family members and from those who  inherit. I think this is where it gets complicated   because the homes themselves are not valuable. The  land is valuable. But who gets the land? How do   you track people down, for example? Because again,  if people die and leave a home, you need to track  
    (07:21) those family members down. And if they haven't  followed up and if they're hard to find because,   for example, they're not in Japan or they live  in Tokyo somewhere and not in the village,   that becomes a very difficult proposition. But  also, what do you do with the land? Who gets   rights to the land? So as long as they're homes,  it's almost like it's a contained problem, when  
    (07:43) they become land that becomes a different problem. Any conversation about Japan, it doesn't matter   how short or long, earthquakes come up. It's  come up a few times already in our conversation,   Shaimaa. But given how earthquake-prone Japan  is, empty houses sitting there surely also   present some kind of hazard. Is that an issue? Yes. I've seen that firsthand. You know,  
    (08:06) in the new year, when an earthquake happened  in the Noto Peninsula, when you go there and   you see the smaller villages, and you see older  houses that have either been completely destroyed   or they've been affected and they're kind  of like leaning on their side waiting to be   destroyed or waiting to completely collapse, that  is actually dangerous for the houses next to them  
    (08:28) and the houses on the other side of the road.  And I've seen that in many of the streets where   people have trouble getting into their own home,  not because the home itself has been affected,  but because these older houses are in danger  of collapsing. So you're absolutely right.   These empty homes in a country that is so  earthquake prone become a problem for the  
    (08:48) neighbours and the neighbourhoods they're in. Shaimaa you've already mentioned there is a   housing crisis around the world. Young people  as well find it really difficult, I think,   here in the UK to get on the housing ladder and  to buy a home. Are there foreigners sitting here   looking at the real estate pages in Japan going,  here is a massive opportunity for me to go and  
    (09:06) get an affordable home somewhere beautiful? Yeah, I think many foreigners are waking up to   the fact that this is an opportunity. I've spoken  to a couple of people, for example, one of them,   who is now a TikTok phenomenon. His name is Anton  Wormann. He is from Sweden, from Stockholm. He is   a model who's now turned renovator, and he went  viral, because essentially what he did is he  
    (09:29) bought an Akiya, and he chronicled his journey  into this fixer-upper in the middle of Tokyo. Wow. Welcome, welcome. So I spent about   a year into making this house beautiful again. I was just going to say it doesn't   look abandoned to me. No, it's not abandoned. It was   abandoned for about 10 years. Oh, okay. 
    (09:51) And when I got the keys to this house, it  was things literally everywhere. Japan has   a scarcity of space and just getting rid of  things, getting rid of trash getting rid of   debris costs a lot of money and also a lot of  time. So the houses just gets abandoned that way. I have to say this combines two of my guilty  pleasures. Not only do I love like you Shaimaa  
    (10:13) home renovation shows, I love shows about buying a  property abroad, somewhere in the sun or somewhere   different. So it's the combination of these  two things. But for these people, is it about   gaining followers or are they really trying to  say this is an affordable, good option for you?  I don't know. I think it's a combination  of both. I think it taps into something  
    (10:35) that just translates and transcends everywhere  in the world. I think no matter where you are,   the idea of owning a home, the idea of turning  it from something that's derelict and old and   abandoned to something beautiful and liveable.  You know, it just appeals to so many people.  Tourism is doing really well in Japan. Lots of  people are now going not just to Tokyo, but to all  
    (11:00) over the country. So surely these Akiyas would  be great to be used as guest houses or cafes?  Yes, and this is what Anton is doing. In fact,  he liked it so much. He started his second Akiya   project. He showed it to me. And it was really  interesting to into his second home because you   see it from the beginning when they were laying  down concrete slabs, they're making sure it's  
    (11:22) earthquake safe and it is a lot of work because  you see for example that there are so many things   that were left by the previous owner that he had  to that he had to let go of, deciding what to do,   deciding what to throw away, what to keep. But  essentially his first property, he now rents   it out for visitors, rents it out short term,  when his family comes to visit. And so it is  
    (11:47) a lucrative business opportunity for people who  are willing to put in the work. And as you say,   I think tourism has picked up quite a bit. This  year was phenomenal in the number of tourists that   have come to Japan. I think in one month, there  were about 3 million, if not more. Just the fact  
    (12:04) that technology and translation apps is a lot more  advanced. Japan has become much more accessible,   not just the big touristy areas, but you can go  into these nooks and crannies of some villages   and explore because you can get access to  them. So if Akiyas then turn out to be this   new phenomenon where more tourists are coming in,  more people are investing in these empty homes,  
    (12:29) That's actually a win-win situation because all  of these villages, all of the local governments,   would then say, look, well, this could be  a new lease of life for those villages.  So Shaimaa, what are the foreigners doing  once they've renovated, bought and renovated   the Akiya? Are they staying put and living  there or using them to set up a business? 
    (12:51) Some of the foreigners who are coming, they're  coming because they want to have a foot in Japan.   So, for example, they live in America, they live  in the UK, they live anywhere in Europe, and this   is an affordable option for them to come and have  a holiday home, you know, in the mountains or by  
    (13:06) the beach in Japan. But, for example, I've met  a couple. The husband is from the UK originally.   The wife is Japanese, and they've just had a  baby boy. His name is Sam. Her name is Nanami   and their baby boy is baby Aiden. And Sam's been  living in Japan for about seven years, I think,   or even more. And, you know, Nanami is from Tokyo.  And they've decided that they just wanted more for  
    (13:27) their money. So what was interesting about their  case and their journey is that they almost paid   the same amount of money Anton paid for his home.  I think they paid $100,000, but their country home   is a lot bigger. And when I asked Sam why he did  it, he said, it's just bulks more that I can get  
    (13:43) for this kind of money in the UK. It's a huge  house with a land and a big garden overlooking   the mountains. It's just beautiful and they just  wouldn't get that anywhere else in the world,   especially in Europe and especially in the  UK. And so this was about a lifestyle choice. I definitely think if we had done a new  build, that would have been a lot easier  
    (14:04) and straightforward, probably affordable  and quicker. But it's such a beautiful   house and you just kind of think like It's nice to  preserve that and to, you know, extend its life. Shaimaa, what do the Japanese think about  foreigners coming in and buying up these Akiyas?  So far, I don't think that we've seen  any negative reaction because remember,  
    (14:24) the foreigners who come here are not tapping  into something that the Japanese want or that   the Japanese have expressed interest in. This  is very much still a novel phenomena. This   is something that foreigners have caught on to  because, again, of the housing crisis, because of   the idea that these homes could be renovated  because they come from renovation culture. 
    (14:54) Everything that we're talking about, though, in  the grand scheme of things, it probably barely   makes a dent, Shaimaa. So does the Government  actually have a plan to deal with the Akiyas?  Yeah, I mean, so far, we're talking about hundreds  of people that are interested in these Akiyas,   a few hundred that take them on and actually buy  these Akiyas and transform them and renovate them.  
    (15:17) With government statistics by the year 2038,  if I'm not mistaken, one in every three homes   in Japan is going to be abandoned. That is a huge  number, and I think they're trying to tackle it in   different ways. There are local governments,  local municipalities or local governments in   these villages that are trying to give away these  homes for free, just to say, come, find something  
    (15:43) to do with this house, make it a cafe, make it a  business, come and live in it, but just, in a way,   just breathe life into this village. But it's a  huge problem and again, it comes back to the core   of Japan's population crisis. The Government  has been trying many things. The Government   has been trying to tackle the population crisis  for a long, long time now. And I think you have  
    (16:07) to deal with the core of it, which is that you  need more people in this country to occupy these   homes. But these existing empty homes also  need to be either reused, renovated, or just   have people in them to give them a new lease of  life. And it's not just about the physical homes,   it's about how do you make those homes lucrative?  How do you make those homes liveable? And a lot  
    (16:32) of that has to do with, do you have schools  around you for your kids? Do you have hospitals,   et cetera? And so It's a whole infrastructure  system that needs to happen around these homes.  Shaimaa, the Prime Minister,  Fumio Kishida, has actually said,   and it was such a dramatic statement, that Japan  is on the brink of no longer even being able to  
    (16:53) function as a society because of this massive  demographic problem that you've described to us.  What's his way out of it? It was very unusual for him to sound   so alarmed when he's actually alarmed. They're  trying to come up with ways and incentives for   families to move to outside of the cities and into  some places in the countryside. They're trying  
    (17:17) financial incentives and financial aid to families  with more children. It's about trying to shift the   culture so that more people are getting married,  more people are having babies in your own country,  but also welcoming more people into your  own country so that more people than occupy   all of these empty spaces that you have. These houses, these Aykias though, Shaimaa,  
    (17:38) they tell a much richer, bigger story  about what is happening in the country.  These Akiyas essentially tell the story of Japan  at this very moment, the crisis that Japan is   facing, the fact that this is a country that's  facing a shrinking, aging population, essentially   a population crisis. Essentially people die, yhey  leave behind homes that don't hold much value,  
    (18:02) that no one wants. And essentially what they tell  you is that this is a country that's emptying out   and that is trying to find a solution to  give itself, to give society and to give   these homes a new lease of life. Arigato gozaimasu Shaimaa.  Arigato gozaimasu. Thank you, Shaima.  Thanks, Lucy. It's such a  pleasure. Lovely to talk to you. 
    (18:28) And thank you so much for watching. If you  want more episodes of The Global Story,   you can find us wherever you get your podcasts.  You can also subscribe, and don't forget to   leave your comments about today's program  in the section below. Thanks for watching.


https://youtu.be/liyn5xWvx44?si=kJRz1xsy-k_Et8EU
    (54) Which country has the best education in the world? - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=liyn5xWvx44
    
    (00:00) Hello, I'm Lucy Hockings. From the BBC World Service, This is The Global Story. A good education can make us richer, healthier and help us to thrive. And governments around the world compete in global rankings to see which nation is deemed to have the best school system in the world. Asian schools often get the best results,
    (00:20) with some Nordic countries also highly praised. But in many parts of the world, there are often huge barriers to getting children into the classroom at all. It's cruel not to open schools for girls. We have as much right to learn as boys do. It would be cruel of the Taliban not to allow us to return to our schools.
    (00:42) So what does the best school system in the world look like, and which country educates its children the best? With me today in the Global Story studio is Sean Coughlan, some of you will have heard Sean and I talking already on The Global Story about the UK Royal Family as he's one of our royal correspondents.
    (01:08) But before that, Sean, for many years you were one of our education correspondents and you led BBC News coverage of what we're going to talk about today, which is global education. So welcome. Thank you. Good to see you again. Also joining us today is John Jerrim, who is a professor at the University
    (01:24) of College London's Institute of Education. And John has dug deep into the global data about different education systems around the world and is here to reveal all. Hi, John. Hi. Thanks a lot for inviting me. So we want to talk about what which country has the best education system in the world, if we can say that. But what evidence are there?
    (01:45) What measures are there, Sean, to judge that? Well, I suppose the most commonly used measure would be what's known as the Pisa tests. And these are tests taken by children at the age of 15, in a number of countries around the world, not all the countries, about 80 in the last round and since the year 2000, results have been published,
    (02:05) ranking education systems in terms of their level of achievement and the tests are in key areas of reading, maths and science. Um, when they when they were introduced. First of all, that was a very contentious idea because people said, how can you possibly compare big countries? How how can you compare America to Luxembourg or to, you know,
    (02:24) or to parts of China or whatever? And people would say they're very different systems, different cultures, um, different levels of income. But the people who introduced these tests weren't from education. They were from an economics background. It was the OECD, the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development.
    (02:42) And they approached education the way they might look at GDP or look at measuring inflation. And it was a very different way of looking at it. And they got people to take these tests, often against a great deal of local resistance, and then compared them. And they have produced for the last couple of decades,
    (02:57) this huge amount of data that allows people in one country to look at how they compare to others. And I suppose their big finding often is that what we think of as being our education system isn't inevitable. You can do well or you can do badly. Some people do better at different things. Girls and boys might do differently, different groups.
    (03:17) And I think this has just cast a big light by not letting education systems just look internally, but also to look at other comparisons. So, John, which countries do do well in these Pisa tests? So the ones that perform consistently well over time and across those different studies are the East Asian countries.
    (03:37) So typical examples include, uh, South Korea, Singapore, Hong Kong. They always consistently do well. There's some that do particularly well in Pisa, on top of that. Finland was, you know, a hot topic for a long time, although its performance has declined recently. Um, Estonia is a country that does very well now in Pisa
    (03:57) and Canada to some extent also. And the countries that don't do so well, Sean? Well, they tend to be countries which I suppose our poorer countries, um, you find in, in terms of countries that participate maybe in parts of South America, Central America, some of the Arab world too. Countries in sub-Saharan Africa don't take part.
    (04:16) And quite a lot of Asian countries don't take part either. So it's a partial test. But perhaps what's interesting about doing badly is that often big European countries France, Germany, Italy, Spain, and to an extent, the education systems within the UK aren't that brilliant, really. and as John suggested, the interesting bit is they have a lot
    (04:36) of history, a lot of money, a lot of development behind them. But they're being outpaced and outperformed by these fast upcoming countries, you know, Singapore or Estonia or, um, Taiwan or those sort of places which, which we don't historically think of as being economic rivals. But I suppose the argument for the Pisa tests is if you want to have a knowledge economy,
    (04:58) an economy based on skills, this is how you measure it. And those other countries are outpacing us at the moment. So I think that's the interesting comparison. That raises the issue, though, and I've done interviews around Pisa and these tests for years about what a good education actually is, John,
    (05:15) because there'll be those that say that, you know, how do you measure that? How do you actually define what a good education is? When you think about some of these East Asian countries and what the students go through, how hard they have to work, how stressed they are. Is that really part of a good, well rounded, holistic education?
    (05:33) Yeah. So as Sean was saying, they've really focused on the academic side in their kind of history, maths, reading and science. But you're right, kind of a good education is a much broader thing. And we as parents or whatever kind of want a lot more for our children than just to be good at those academic kind of side of things.
    (05:52) And in fairness, the OECD in recent years have tried to move the dial a little bit and measure more of these kind of softer skills. So in the latest round of Pisa, they tried to introduce a creativity test. Um, how well that worked or not, uh, I think is open to debate, but they are kind of live to that issue.
    (06:11) And as part of Pisa, they do kind of conduct this big questionnaire exercise as well, where they capture things like kids' wellbeing and how confident they are. So that does become part of it. But it doesn't often kind of, um, become the headline. Sean, some countries take these Pisa rankings incredibly seriously. Why?
    (06:31) And how do they think that a better education system is going to affect even the economic outcomes of the country that, you know, they're running? Well, I suppose there are two ends of that scale, the countries who might think they're doing well and then get a bit of a shock. I mean, in Germany, people talk about Pisa shock in Germany, because they thought
    (06:48) they were very good, but there was also an element of complacency, and they got the Pisa results first time around and realised that in fact, they were pretty awful. And that turned into quite a political scandal. 'Our scores aren't as good as we thought they were, what are we going to do with ourselves?'
    (07:02) The other end of the spectrum, there are countries who see education as their way out, as some individuals always have in their lives. John mentioned Singapore in the 1960s. Singapore would have been one of the poorest countries in the world, it would have been a country with very low levels of literacy,
    (07:19) and it deliberately invested in education to make itself a high skills, high income country. Our main responsibility is to nurture the students in such a way that they will be ready for the future to become productive citizens of tomorrow. And we all know that, uh, the future is going to become more complex,
    (07:39) much more uncertain, much more unpredictable, much more ambiguous. I suppose it's back to the idea that economists might say, if you want to see the economy of the future, look at the classrooms of today. And it's a massive economic driver. And if you look at the sort of jobs which now are in demand
    (07:55) and the jobs which are well-paid, and where economies want to place themselves in the economic food chain, education, and education skills more broadly, are absolutely central to that, and that's a long-term game. But countries which have chosen to invest in education and skills, who consciously decided to make this a priority, will see the economic reward.
    (08:15) So let's look then at what works, because we've looked at which countries are considered to have successful education systems. But I think we all want to know why. Why? Sean, does Singapore have something in common with Estonia? I mean, does it? These high achieving countries, what do they have in common?
    (08:32) Well, a long time ago, I remember trying to do an identikit picture of what a successful Pisa country would look like. Um, and there are sort of philosophical questions about equality. Countries which make sure that all their pupils get through a certain level of education to a certain standard, regardless of their background, do well.
    (08:49) If you are teaching them by different level or abilities, then you are segregating them. And and we don't want to segregate any people in the world. Why are we doing that in the schools? That's my personal opinion. This is one of the main things why Estonia is successful. Shanghai used to be the model that was talked about a great deal,
    (09:13) because there was an assumption there that no matter if children came from a very deprived background, they would still get to a certain level of education. And their education system was based around that. Um, teachers were expected to make sure their pupils got there. But I think there are other cultural factors, possibly.
    (09:29) It's interesting. It was a very striking how many of the top Pisa performers are small and fairly new nation states, younger states, ambitious, wanting to define themselves. Often countries which live near very big neighbours. Estonia is near Russia. You know, Canada's near the USA. Singapore has lots of bigger geographical neighbours around it too.
    (09:53) Or Taiwan is near to China. The superstars at Pisa are often small, quite cohesive countries who have set themselves a target of getting better, often places without any great natural resource. They don't have oil, they don't have big populations. They have to focus on something like this. And I think that is the characteristic of a top Pisa star.
    (10:16) John, what about the age in which children start school? I remember sending my summer-born little four-year-old off to school in his uniform and thinking how tiny he was, and that if he was in Finland, it would be another three years before he started school. I also have a summer born four-year-old who's just started school,
    (10:35) so that's a very kind of poignant question to me. Um, I don't think there's any good international evidence on the best time that children start school. I don't think that it's clear-cut that it's better to start them earlier versus later, at least coming from the international kind of assessment data.
    (10:52) What I would say is, you know, there is a bit of a blurred line between school and earlier education as well. So there's often a fixation on, you know, we start school at this age, but I know I sent my four-year-old to nursery beforehand, and he was definitely doing some education stuff in the year beforehand.
    (11:10) In countries where children don't formally start school until age seven, it's not that they're not doing anything beforehand, right, a lot of them. A lot of them will be kind of doing different types of earlier types of education. It's taken us this long to get to one of the most important things that happens in a classroom,
    (11:26) and that is the actual teaching and the teacher, John. How much does teacher quality or the funding of teachers play a role in these countries that do well? Yeah, well, we know from the international evidence teacher quality matters. It matters a lot. You know, if you are fortunate enough to have a very good teacher,
    (11:44) you can make kind of up to three or four months extra learning gains over the course of an academic year, compared to if you have one of the kind of, um, lowest quality teachers or whatever in the class. So it is a big, big driving factor. How much it explains international differences you can't quite put a figure on.
    (12:04) I have a feeling that it's part of the mix that goes into why some of these countries do better than worse, but it's probably not the major component for a lot of them. So I think it plays some role, but not kind of like the key ingredient by itself, as it were. Sean, when we've been talking about the Pisa rankings,
    (12:21) you haven't actually mentioned the UK and the US, I don't think. But some of our listeners in those two countries that are listening will probably be surprised to see how far down the rankings the UK and the US are. Why is that? Well, I think in the case of the United States, the big issue there is the massive divide both in wealth, in, uh,
    (12:44) in geography and also, uh, fairness, I suppose, equity. If America was taken... America's overall result, the United States result, is quite mediocre. But if you take some of the individual states, like Massachusetts, had it entered on its own as a separate country, would do incredibly well, be right at the top.
    (13:02) Some of the southern states, I think I remember people talk about Mississippi before, and a few other southern states, do really badly. They would be, uh, not of the Western world if their results were put with other countries. And so what you get up is an average and you get into another question. And so the average is rather middling is the overall result.
    (13:22) You also get into that sort of bigger question then about fairness overall because America has lots of elite universities, has lots of elite schools too. They might say their system works. The money, the funding, everything goes into an elite system, but doesn't serve very many people who are struggling in other schools.
    (13:40) And I suppose that's the sort of question that's highlighted by the international comparison. The UN estimates that 224 million children need educational support, and that includes more than 72 million who can't attend school at all because of war or conflict in their country. There are also other barriers too, such as living a very long distance from school,
    (14:01) what's happening with our climate, and poverty. Sean, if we look at war, it's obviously a massive factor that can stop children attending school. And we can see this happening in Gaza at the moment, in Sudan and Ukraine as well. Just take us through what the impact is on a child if they can't get access to education.
    (14:20) Well, I always think this is a scandal, that it's not even a bigger scandal because, as you're saying, tens of millions of children never even get to go to any kind of education. And it's not just about learning to read and write. It's what happens beyond that point. You know, if you imagine trying to navigate a modern world
    (14:37) without basic literacy skills, trying to navigate a digital world increasingly, no matter where you are, and that's kind of implications for your own wealth, your own family's wealth, um, also your health, your chances of being caught up in conflicts, being influenced by extremism and all kinds of bad things, criminality,
    (14:59) all those are linked to a lack of education. And I think it's a pernicious thing we've allowed. It's extraordinary. Here we are in 2024, and there are still tens of millions of children who don't even get to start education. And it's not just war, it's corruption. It's bad management. It's teachers not being paid.
    (15:20) Um, I remember going to schools in Africa where there were empty classrooms and you'd say, well, why isn't anyone going to school? Teachers weren't getting paid. They got other jobs as taxi drivers. And and it was awful. And you think there still goes on and it shouldn't be the case. It should be something that we're reading about in history books.
    (15:38) And also particularly there's been a lot of work on girls missing out on education has an impact on their families as well. Um, if children, if girls leave school early to get married too young, perhaps, they condemn their own families to poverty. You don't learn the skills you need. You don't get the chances you need.
    (15:56) It's the most extraordinary unfairness. And it's odd that we're allowing it to happen even now. I have to fetch water from the trading centre and bring it to the mining site so that we can pan for gold. I want to go back to school. And, Sean, I think we should take a moment to address what's happening in Afghanistan.
    (16:17) There is still this massive global education campaign to let girls learn. But when the Taliban took over, it's become the only country in the world that does not allow girls and women to attend schools and universities. So if you're over 12 and you're a girl in Afghanistan, you can't go to school. It's cruel not to open schools for girls.
    (16:40) We have as much right to learn as boys do. It would be cruel of the Taliban not to allow us to return to our schools. John, we've been reflecting on how difficult it is for girls and young women in some countries to access education. They're even denied it in Afghanistan. And there's clear discrimination that obviously takes place in some countries.
    (17:01) But in terms of OECD countries, isn't it the case that girls are outperforming boys? That's certainly true in some specific subjects. So the clearest example is reading. So there's the Pisa assessment of 15-year-olds in reading. And there's another assessment called Pals which is ten-year-olds' reading.
    (17:20) And in both of those you do very clearly see a gender gap where girls always outperform boys. It holds true across pretty much every country in the world, and it holds true over time. And we have data from England and the United States where children take very early kind of literacy and verbal tests, you know, age 3A5.
    (17:39) And you can see even very early on in kind of, um, children's lives. So it's very clear in terms of reading, in terms of other subjects, it's a bit more nuanced. So mathematics, um, it's a lot more kind of even. In some countries there's definitely kind of still an advantage to boys. So it does vary across the different subjects.
    (17:59) And Sean, how much do you think an education system can actually change? Are other countries looking at Singapore or Estonia or some of these high-performing countries and saying, we need to be more like this and then they can make it happen. I think they can change. I think you often get into that thing about people say,
    (18:16) oh, so-and-so has got a great culture of education, the country, as if it were some sort of act of God that that some countries do well and some other countries do badly. But I think the interesting thing about the Pisa tests is they actually show that things can change. Things aren't inevitable. Um, some countries can show
    (18:32) that children from very deprived backgrounds can do very well. And that raises the question, well, why can't that happen elsewhere? And John, what about the way that kids are taught? Is there a magic formula there now that we know that works? No, is the short answer there, putting it bluntly. You know, teasing out,
    (18:51) I think, as Sean said very nicely, the very specific factor that's driving these country-level differences is really, really tricky. So people will often want to point to a teaching method or a thing or a policy and try to export it from one country to another. It doesn't really work like that, and it's not that simple.
    (19:11) Anecdotally, I live in a part of London which the schools are considered low decile, so there's a lot of kids from poorer backgrounds in those schools. And the schools were underperforming for years. Then the government came in and spent a lot of money in our borough on schools. And it might not come as any surprise, Sean, that it worked.
    (19:31) Standards went up. Is there just not a fundamental here, that in order for kids to get the best education, quite a lot of money needs to be spent? It does come down to money and resourcing. I think money is vital as a starting point, but it is also how you spend it and there is a basic level of funding.
    (19:49) You need the right number of teachers, you need the right equipment, you need to be warm, you need to make sure the children are well fed and comfortable and able to learn. And they're well supported in that sense. But then it's often that I suppose you look to the evidence again. I remember, for a while, class size was the big thing.
    (20:05) Let's cut down class sizes. The Pisa test suggests that that has, beyond a certain point, not that much of an impact, really, because often some of the most successful countries in East Asia had huge classes, didn't seem to trouble them, and other factors must have been going on. So I think, yes, certainly, you can't shirk responsibility
    (20:24) for funding schools properly, allowing people from all backgrounds to have a fair chance and support them. But I do think often what this raises is how much this is a choice. You can choose to spend on education or choose not to. You can choose by policy to ensure that people from, no matter where their starting point is, get a fair chance to catch up.
    (20:45) They might not catch up right all the way, but you can, you can decide whether or not you're going to have an education system that is based around getting as many people as possible to do well. Or historically, I think, one of the weaknesses of the education system in England was that there's a great resistance to the idea that everyone could do well
    (21:06) if you had a test in our culture in Britain that said, here's a test and everyone's going to pass it. People would think... People would be outraged. They'd say, this is a rubbishy test because it's not, you know, because we build our systems based on a sort of filtering, sorting mechanism. I know Shanghai was hailed for a while as being a great example.
    (21:23) And there they had a policy of expecting children, regardless of their background, regardless of the deprivation of reaching a certain level of education. The sort of education system you end up with isn't an act of nature. There's a series of things. There may be, it suits the people who run places.
    (21:41) It might be how they like it. But I think they're not accidents. They are products of how we run our society and they can be changed. John, thank you so much for being with us. No thank you. Enjoyed it. Sean, lovely to have you here. Pleasure. If you want more episodes of The Global Story, you can find us wherever you get your podcasts.
    (22:01) Each day we dive deep into a single story, bringing you in-depth analysis of world events. Don't forget to subscribe as well so you never miss an episode. Thanks so much for watching! Goodbye.


https://youtube.com/watch?v=p-N3-Q8WyfU&si=ekb_fDrW81K6URY7
    How Gen Z and TikTok are changing the way we speak - The Global Story podcast, BBC World Service - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p-N3-Q8WyfU
    
    (00:00) Hello, I'm Lucy Hockings. From the BBC  World Service, this is The Global Story. For many thousands of years,  language has been changing. Here in the UK, the gradual departure from what became known as the Queen's English is a trend which has often been characterised as a threat to cultural identity.
    (00:25) But with the advent of social  media, the pace of change  may be running away from us. Phrases like "it's giving", "rizz", "no cap", these are all terms which we attribute to internet culture and specifically to younger, millennial and gen Z demographics. Today we're considering how the mass migration to living our lives online is having
    (00:47) an impact on the spoken word in the real world. It's even made its mark on  the Oxford English Dictionary. Well, with me here in the studio today is  former BBC journalist, author and linguist  Sophia Smith Galer and Neil Edgeller,  who is from BBC Learning English. Sophia, Neil, lovely to have  you with us on the pod. Hi.
    (01:15) Hi. Hello, Lucy. Neil, last night I sat with my teenage kids as I now know you did as well and said, "I'm discussing language tomorrow. Things have changed. I'm hearing these words from you all the time. Can we talk about it?" And   they were straight away like, "Mum, don't do it. Don't use the words. Don't embarrass yourself.  
    (01:32) You will never come back from this at all. You know, like this is just steer clear,   play it straight". What did you say to your teenage kids?  Pretty much exactly the same conversation.  I've become aware of this whole range of  vocabulary used by this generation that  seems completely and utterly exclusive and 
    (01:51) they find it funny when I try and use  those expressions because I use them badly.  I mean you're such a boomer, if you  basically you start using these words you're  tainted and it's a no-go. And Sophia you don't have kids   but I mean you're so aware of how language is changing. And you're even writing a book at the  
    (02:08) moment about linguicide. What actually is linguicide?  So linguicide is the phenomenon of a language  disappearing and perhaps even dying or  becoming extinct. And this is happening  around the world at an alarming rate. So a  language disappearing because it's been  criminalised, war, genocide, other obvious 
    (02:25) examples. But linguicide equally can be  more covert. So linguists also described a  language becoming associated with  shame and speakers being so ashamed of  speaking that language,  they begin to speak another.  And tell us about your job, Neil. You're  creating content to help people learn English. We 
    (02:43) make videos and podcasts and web pages to  help learners of English around the world,  whatever level they are, to teach them  English, but also to help them to enjoy  themselves in English. Well, language is obviously the social   tool that we all use to communicate. But as we've already discussed, it's so different depending on  
    (03:05) the generation that's talking and we alter our language depending on who   we're talking to. When it comes to our kids and what we're seeing particularly with the younger   generations, Neil, what sort of words are you seeing emerge at the moment?  Now we're gonna mention some of the  words that we're not supposed to mention.
    (03:21) Okay, I'm gonna let you do it. So I think of all of the  things I've heard  recently,  the most fascinating is this word, skibidi. That was the first one that came up at my dinner table as well. Can you use it in a sentence?  Well, I don't think I can  effectively. I can try  and I get  laughed at. But it's very,  very fluid grammatically.
    (03:42) So for example, I have heard the expression, the skibidi rizzler. Rizzler is connected to this word  rizz, which we may come on to talk   about as well. But skibidi seems to be able to be thrown in almost anywhere.   And nobody, including my kids, can tell me what it really means. I think that's part of the whole  
    (03:59) sort of exclusivity of each generation's use of language.  To the point about exclusivity and saying,  "Mum, please don't say this word." We should  think of language speaking also as identity  making. So if you are in a subgroup and you  use particular phrases to signify 'I am part  of this group', the minute you start hearing 
    (04:20) these phrases adopted outside of the group,  it's not the in-group language anymore. So  it stops being the in-group language of teenagers,   for example, because mum's using it. And then they'll just start using another one.  But Sophia, what Neil and I are finding  challenging is this is changing so quickly all the 
    (04:37) time. Neil's already mentioned rizz. I  remember doing quite a kind of academic  interview around the word rizz when  it was the Oxford word of the year. The Oxford word of the year has been revealed  and this year it's rizz. Now, if you've no  idea what that means, don't worry, you  might just be over 30. I'm lucky I've got 
    (04:56) teenagers, I know this one. The kids are not using rizz anymore. They might  use it in a slightly patronising ironic way.  But Neil's now saying they're  using rizzler. What's rizzler?  A rizzler is a person who has rizz. Duh.  See? I'm getting myself into all sorts of trouble  here and all sorts of traps. But it is so, it's 
    (05:19) evolving so quickly. It's evolving really quickly. And if you   think about in the past how languages developed and changed. A language will always change   because our needs as people change and different and new things happen. And in the past,   you may have lived in a remote village and the only language contact or contact  
    (05:37) you had with any kind of linguistic innovation would have been some trader rolling into town   and then moving forward or maybe perhaps you would move. Today,   if you're consuming mass media in social media, you're actually seeing a very diverse array of   different voices from around the world. I can be speaking to my nephews at home  
    (05:55) in New Zealand, a world away, it seems to me, and yet they're using the same words   as my teenage kids here in London. That wasn't the case when we were younger.  No, it wasn't. And that's part of this  homogenisation that social media brings, that the  kids are using the same slang globally. When  I was at school, the words that we would 
    (06:15) use to describe a really bright person or a  less bright person might be different from the  words used by someone who was brought up  in a different part of the same country.  Neil is it just video-based social media or  is there influence here around text sites and  micro blogging and things as well? Absolutely yes and a lot of the new  
    (06:33) vocabulary that we've seen emerging over the last few years comes from blogging and   from online communities communicating through text. People are walking around   and saying LOL and FOMO and YOLO to each other. That's an interesting development.  And we're saying LOL. We're not saying L-O-L.  We're not saying F-O-M-O. We've adopted 
    (06:54) them into the sort of existing lexical  structure that we have so that they sound like  normal words. And that didn't take long?  Didn't take long at all, no. And with some of these words, the skibidi,   the rizz, rizzler, no cap. Where do they come from? Is it just, is it from different cultural   groups? Is it from different sectors of society? Where are they actually emerging from? 
    (07:15) A lot of the words are being innovated within  in-groups and then they get introduced to  the mainstream. We're seeing a lot of  vocabulary coming from black and Latino LGBT  culture in the US. We're seeing loads of  expressions coming from that, like "it's giving",  "slay", all come from those spaces. We're  also seeing language emerging from what 
    (07:39) actually were incel subculture words from  even the 2000s. Some of these expressions  don't even come from the 2010s. They're a  little older than we think. When it comes to  social media and language change, we think a  term is new, but in reality, it's likely been  in circulation for some time before a sort  of more influential person perhaps uses the 
    (08:01) term and then we see the words leave these  peripheries and leave these subgroups they  become mainstream and it's these words  that then become more widely adopted.  And Neil do you think it's also like with our  kids and I'm trying to think back to when I was  young as well it's a bit of an act of rebellion? Yeah absolutely yes and I think the interesting  
    (08:20) thing about the language change we're seeing at the moment is just the pace   in comparison to pre-internet discourse. You know, the words are there all around   the world immediately. Some get picked up, some don't. And that happened before,   but it was just much slower. I mean, we need to cast our mind back  
    (08:42) before 1989, the World Wide Web. What was happening with language before then.  Well, I remember when I was at school. Back in the day.  The reinvention of the word wicked, meaning  great or cool or whatever. I think I am just  by about a year too old to use that and feel  comfortable using it, even though it's been in 
    (09:02) circulation for about 30 years now. So  these words have always come about and been  reinvented, this, what they call semantic  shift, where a word has an original meaning  and then suddenly has a new meaning. And it's  all tied up with the exclusivity and stuff.  But it's the pace with which it happens  these days, which is really astounding. 
    (09:23) Sophia, you speak many languages. A couple.  Italian, Arabic. I studied Spanish and Arabic at university   and my family speaks Italian. I grew up hearing it but not speaking it.  So what about these other languages in the  world? Is it the same? I mean, are they  experiencing the same kind of changes in  these words that we are seeing in English? 
    (09:44) Oh, certainly. All languages are experiencing  the phenomena we've described, such as  linguistic innovation and adopting new  words. The obvious difference that we may  observe in other languages is the influence  of English and the fact that English as a  language, it holds prestige  in so many global domains. 
    (10:05) And there are moves right around the world  to try and protect language. I mean, I spend  some time in French speaking Canada and  there's real moves to sort of stop the creep  of English into French that spoke in there.  Giorgia Meloni, the leader in Italy right now,  very protective of the Italian language. Countries have different attitudes towards  
    (10:26) how much they try and control linguistic change, which defies control. Languages are,   even speaking to linguicide that I'm writing about, the idea that a language   can die must therefore mean a language can live. So as living things, they're really difficult to   control. And if you say to people, you can't use this word that we're now hearing lots  
    (10:48) of people say you must use the French version. It's kind of coming a little bit   too late because the French version didn't immediately dominate or resonate with   speakers. So it can actually be quite challenging. You're trying to reverse   time almost in something like that. Neil, I wonder if words as well and  
    (11:06) phrases that we use can sometimes just be fashionable. I mean, I'm not talking about rizz,   only lasting 18 months or whatever, but other words and phrases that grab hold and   are trendy but then kind of die away again, almost like fashion or clothing or music.  Yeah, I think that's right. You can look at  expressions which are used by many people 
    (11:31) over a short period of time that then kind  of vanish. So we have at BBC Learning English  podcast called The English We Speak. We look  at idiomatic expressions that are sort of  trending at the time. A couple of years  ago, we were talking about blended working,  blended working, working  at home and in the office. 
    (11:49) Yeah, I haven't heard that one for a while. People don't use it anymore. We all say hybrid   working now. So yes, there is a fashion for these words, they come and go.  And Sophia, you've not just been looking at  how our vocabulary has changed, but it's the  way we say things as well. And this notion of  up-talk, particularly sort of rising at the end 
    (12:06) of a sentence. I'm from New Zealand. I  mean, we all speak like that at home and  in the antipodes. I also wondered if it's  not just social media that's influencing  the way that we speak. It's maybe  years of everyone watching Neighbours.  We have always used up-talk. I mean, it's  most characteristic, I think, for asking 
    (12:25) questions. I just did it there, asking  questions. That would be up-talk with this rising  intonation at the end of the phrase. When  it comes to social media and using up-talk,  something that I've written about in the  past is how asking is there a TikTok voice or  accent, is there a way that I speak, that I  adopt when I'm making a TikTok video. The idea 
    (12:44) is that when we make video content, we use a  lot of rising intonation possibly to relate  to our audience. It's more engaging. It's more engaging.  Another theory is that I'm keeping you  listening. The rising intonation suggests there's  more to come. You're hooking people.  Hooking people in. When it comes to social  media video, if I can complete a video 
    (13:06) retaining someone's attention, it's more  likely to perform better on the algorithm. So  actually what's possibly happening is creators  are furthering linguistic innovation based  on algorithmic direction, which is fascinating. Neil, speaking of intonation, what about the   change to pronunciation? Are we seeing some British words change and they're  
    (13:28) now said in a much more American way? There used to be a much greater distinction   between the way Americans would say or pronounce a word and the way that British   people would and now that's more fluid and we're not able to say with such certainty that   that's American English and that's British English, so let's have an example of the  
    (13:47) word which I say as 'schedule'. Younger members of BBC Learning English say 'schedule',   and 'schedule' is what we used to say was the American pronunciation.  What about grammar then, Neil? Are we  seeing those changes? They must surely be  slower. Grammar really does change slowly. You   can look at, for example, you could pick up a copy of Frankenstein, which was written  
    (14:09) 200 years ago and absolutely understand it completely. There's nothing in the grammatical   structures which will confuse you. But something that has happened and has   happened more quickly recently because probably of social media is something known   as verbing which is turning nouns into verbs. 
    (14:27) I love doing this. And the most obvious one is   Google to Google or to friend. We are podcasting.  And so that is actually a grammatical change  which we have seen accelerate recently.  Sophia, is language change picking  up momentum? Is it getting faster?  As media will change, linguistic innovation  will change. So it's already so hyperfast and 
    (14:55) powerful in the current vertical video climate  that we're in and the amount of language  we are exposed to. It's hard to imagine how  that can get even sort of more hyperactive,  but I'm quite confident it will. And Neil, in terms of your job, do you love   all these changes to the language? Are you slightly horrified sometimes? 
    (15:12) I'm not horrified in the slightest. I know lots  of people are, and they think that it's wrong  and that mistakes are being made. But  language is dynamic. No one here is sitting  talking like Chaucer, You know, language  changes and I think it's exciting and we need to  embrace it and at BBC Learning English we  try to describe language as it is rather than 
    (15:34) prescribe the way it ought to be. What about the future of language? If   we could look ahead Sophia, what do you think's going to happen in the next 20, 30 years?  I think a lot of the future is predictable  in that when I am in my 40s, 50s, 60s, I'm  probably going to start thinking why are my  kids or the kids around me saying all these 
    (15:56) bizarre words that I've sort of never heard of. And what do you think, Neil, do you think the   other thing that might happen is that we'll see some language sadly die out,   some languages, because of the prevalence of English, the prevalence of what people are   consuming online is going to really influence what's spoken in the home? 
    (16:14) Yeah, unfortunately, that is a reality. I mean,  languages are dying all the time. And one of  the features of language in the  social media age is homogenisation.  Linguicide is such an urgent and pressing  issue because it's believed by the end of the  century that we are in half of the  world's languages will disappear. 
    (16:34) I have a positive story to tell from New  Zealand about that, about how much more Māori  is spoken in New Zealand than when I was  young. And when we talk about how quickly  things change, when I go back home, I  can't believe how much more Māori has just  spoken in everyday life, among people just  casually, it's not a big thing at all. 
    (16:51) They are an example to the world. They are  used all the time in language revitalisation  work as examples of how a language that  appears to be dying, becoming extinct,  whatever phrase you prefer, can  revitalise and acquire new speakers.  I can't have any conversation about anything  that looks at the future anymore without 
    (17:10) mentioning AI. Oh yeah. Is there an  influence there as well? Is that going   to change language?  Interestingly AI is being used again if we  look at linguicide and endangered languages.  I've done reporting looking at how AI is  helping people revive their languages or create  resources very quickly that are able to  support speakers who want to reclaim or 
    (17:33) revitalise a language but again we're seeing  examples where perhaps the AI tools being  made, especially out of endangered languages  where accuracy is so important because  there aren't lots of sources necessarily  for them, and the AI hallucinating making up  words or expressions or grammars for these  languages we described as being of low 
    (17:54) resource, like there's not loads of training data  to train in AI. I would say AI isn't all bad. It  brings lots of very useful tools for communities,  but it kind of has to be observed and  watched. And if it's misbehaving,  it has to be told off.  Well, it's been wicked to have you  both on the podcast. Sophia, thank you. 
    (18:15) Thank you. Neil, good to see you, thanks.  Thank you. If you want more episodes of The Global   Story, you can find us wherever you get your podcasts. We do one big story in depth every   day and don't forget to subscribe. Thanks for watching, goodbye.


https://youtube.com/watch?v=LW89RaUW5BI&si=akzXyUfK4_aSXp1M

    (54) Google And Meta Are Scrambling To Copy TikTok. Can They Catch up? - YouTube
    https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=LW89RaUW5BI
    
    (00:00) Reels, shorts,  stories everywhere you look. Short videos have taken over  social media, and right now there's one  platform that dominates TikTok. I'm scrolling every single  day. I do scroll all the time. I'm checking constantly  throughout the day. I'm fully addicted to  TikTok. I spend a lot of time on the  app,
    (00:21) and I think it's because  they're so good at giving you content that directly  matches what you're interested in. Tiktok is the center of the  internet for young people. It's where they go to be  entertained. It's where they go to keep  up with the news. It's where they go to find  out about trends.
    (00:37) They go to search for things  and shop, and the list goes on. Since 2016, TikTok has grown  to over 1.12 billion monthly active users worldwide. In the U.S., nearly 118  million people use TikTok frequently, spending an  average of 108 minutes per day on the app. I'm properly consuming  content on TikTok Yeah at
    (00:58) least three hours each day. That kind of engagement has  made short videos. A multi-billion dollar  industry. Now platforms like YouTube  shorts, Instagram Reels and even  LinkedIn are racing to catch up. Short form video that's kind  of like the bite size version of video. What's consumable when  you're looking at your
    (01:18) phone? Maybe you're waiting  in line to grab some food somewhere or something. It just seems to be the  right format for video in social media. Short form videos aren't  just popular, they're transforming the way  we consume content by being fast, addictive,  and algorithm driven. The algorithm has also been  the envy of many other
    (01:50) social platforms,  including meta, which has been updating its  content recommendation systems to be more similar  to TikToks. And the algorithm is also  what has drawn and continues to draw a lot of,  especially aspiring creators, to the app. They went all in on short  form video when others weren't really touching it.
    (02:11) Famously, Twitter had short  form video first with vine, but for whatever reason,  they gave up on it. And so that created a vacuum  that TikTok really went into. And definitely the  algorithm that they have seems to do a really good  job at understanding what folks are interested in,  and that has been difficult
    (02:29) for others to replicate. But why are these videos so  addictive? It comes down to three key  factors speed, personalization, and  infinite scrolling. I love that the platform  feels like a very strong community. The algorithm is  really great at spreading information quickly and  things that are relevant to
    (02:49) you. Generally, when I speak to  teens. What I hear from them is  that they feel like the videos that they are being  shown on their feeds on TikTok are particularly  compelling. They feel like TikTok has a  better sense of what they want to see than than they  do themselves. Unlike traditional posts or  long form videos,
    (03:12) short videos deliver quick  dopamine hits. A fast paced mix of  entertainment, education and trends that  keep users engaged for hours. Infinite scrolling and short  form is a method where just capturing your attention  becomes the important thing and doing so in very short  bursts. Whereas in the past  entertainment,
    (03:35) TV, radio plays,  they're about capturing an audience's attention by  being interesting and grabbing your attention to  go on the journey of that show or that particular  play. Whereas now it's almost as  if, if we can just get a minute, a few seconds of your  attention and lock you into this, you know,  and then we'll send you
    (03:56) another thing that you seem  to like through the algorithm. The numbers tell the story. Tiktok's success has forced  many other social media platforms to adapt. Adept, meta owned Instagram  launched Reels in August 2020. Google owned YouTube  introduced Shorts in India in September 2020,  after the country banned
    (04:12) TikTok, and it launched in  the US in 2021. Facebook followed with its  own version of reels that year, and LinkedIn began  experimenting with short form video in early 2024,  hoping to tap into the format's popularity for  professional content and industry insights. I have been using YouTube  shorts a lot,
    (04:30) um, the past few months  especially, and even just in the past  month, my views have been up over  700%. So I do think it's becoming  a lot more popular. I think meta launching reels  and YouTube launching shorts, it was smart for  them to, you know, recognize that  short form was taking off, especially when it happened,
    (04:49) which was in the early,  you know, part of 2020 when pandemic  lockdowns began and people were looking for things to  do online and on their phones. I do still think  that they're behind compared to, uh, where TikTok is. Uh, but, you know,  it's better to have some sort of offering here than  nothing at all.
    (05:09) Videos on Facebook and  Instagram now represent more than 60% of time spent on  both platforms. Reels alone makes up 50% of  total time users spend on Instagram, and are reshared  over 4.5 billion times a day on the platforms. To attract more creators,  Instagram has doubled down on reels with new tools such  as three minute reels,
    (05:29) trial reels and more editing  tools. Metas head of Instagram,  Adam Mosseri, hinted in the past that  reels may even become its own app, but meta did not  give a time frame on when or if this will happen,  as competitors try to catch up to TikTok. The Chinese  owned app continues to evolve, with features like  TikTok shop,
    (05:46) longer videos and more  analytic tools for influencers. Meanwhile,  LinkedIn is testing a new TikTok style short form  video feed. Creators on LinkedIn are  monetizing through multiple streams of income brand  partnerships, speaking gigs,  client leads, courses and digital  products. There's a goldmine happening  on LinkedIn right now.
    (06:05) I would post a video on  TikTok. The very same video will get  400 views, and I'll post it at midnight  on LinkedIn and I'll wake up to 200,000 views. And then by 3:00 pm,  it'll have 3 million views. And like, you know,  that's happened to me multiple times,  where LinkedIn's algorithm kind of just lets the video  simmer a bit and it can go
    (06:24) from, you know,  not having that many views to completely popping in in  a similar way to to TikTok's early days. Linkedin social media  creator Chapman says she makes around $10,000 a month  putting content on LinkedIn for her. The platform's  professional audience makes it more lucrative than  TikTok or Instagram right
    (06:43) now. My income is brand  partnerships with a little bit of consulting,  and the impressions on there have exceeded over 70  million impressions in the last six months,  which is something I've never seen on both Instagram  and TikTok throughout my years doing this. As LinkedIn has moved from  being a purely professional
    (07:01) and job hunting site,  it has become more of a hub for creators,  for influencers, for celebrities,  for brands and thought leaders. We've also seen a  shift to more personal content, and a lot of that  has been driven by creators joining the platform and  posting short videos. So LinkedIn rolling out a  short video feed is really
    (07:24) an example of them catering  to these behaviors that are already happening on the  platform. But there's a dark side to  short form video. While the content is fun,  it can be addictive and comes at a cost. Shrinking attention spans,  rising mental health concerns, and algorithm  driven engagement that often
    (07:47) prioritizes sensationalism  over substance. Kids need about nine hours  of sleep depending on the age, and a lot of kids are  struggling getting to sleep using their screens because  the screens provide blue light. That then tells your  brain it's time to wake up, stay awake so it's harder to  fall asleep.
    (08:07) Kids who have trouble  falling asleep will then resort to their phone to  entertain themselves, to try to get to sleep. So can affect your sleep. It's very easy to lose track  of time when you're using social media. When the time is so  excessive that it's starting to get in the way of other  activities that would be
    (08:25) good for mental health. Things like sleep,  um, time outside, time in person with friends  and family. That's when it may become a  problem. For many teens,  it's it's hard to stop when they start using it. Gen Z, the first generation  to grow up with these platforms is already showing  signs of change.
    (08:45) Many now watch long form  content at 1.5 or even two times speed. Struggling to  sit through traditional formats. I like to multitask and  watch content while I do other things,  so if I'm just scrolling on my phone sometimes,  I might do the two time speed Yeah. 100% TikTok ruined all of  our attention spans.
    (09:02) I don't think we can go back  to the long form video content. But the concerns go beyond  focus. They're spending too much  time. It's too much information  that's stressful. That can be anxiety  provoking for a number of kids. Now, with a potential TikTok  sale looming and global scrutiny intensifying,  platforms are facing a new
    (09:23) kind of pressure not just to  keep users watching, but also to find ways to  make it profitable. Despite massive engagement,  monetizing short form video is tough. A few years ago,  the majority of my income did come from TikTok. Now virtually. It's nothing. It's like  pocket change. Kind of, um, same thing with  Instagram.
    (09:49) I don't make money over  there as of right now. Unlike long form content  where platforms can insert multiple ads,  short videos offer limited ad space. That means lower  revenue per view and creators are feeling it. Short video ads tend to be  placed in between videos, so they're really easy for  users to skip,
    (10:06) which is one of the reasons,  actually, that we have seen platforms prioritizing  longer form video because it gives them more  opportunities to place ads. Most platforms,  with the exception of YouTube and now Snapchat,  also don't share ad revenue from short form videos with  creators, partially because it is  harder to attribute an ad
    (10:27) view to a short video than  it is a long form video when those ads are placed  directly in the content. In 2024, TikTok made an  estimated $23.6 billion in ad revenue, but most  creators earn only a few dollars per million views. Youtube shorts introduced ad  revenue sharing, but at about $0.04 per 1000  views,
    (10:47) it's far lower than what  long form YouTube videos generate. Creators are very  frustrated. Technically, it is easier  than ever to go viral, to build an audience and to  start a business. But in practice,  what a lot of creators are finding is that the days of  true virality are ending. As our social media usage  has just become so much more
    (11:09) fragmented and building a  sustainable business is incredibly hard work and  there's a lot of competition out there. Viral success  doesn't necessarily translate to sustainable  businesses. Creators are experimenting  with new ways to make money. Brand deals and sponsorships  are still the main source of
    (11:27) income, but features like  TikTok shop, Instagram shopping and  YouTube super thanks make it easier to sell directly to  fans. Some are also turning to  subscriptions, offering exclusive content  for a monthly fee. This year, we expect  creators to generate just over $10 billion from brand  deals on social media,
    (11:47) but their individual  earnings will vary significantly based on a lot  of different factors like which platforms they're on,  how many platforms are included in the deal,  follower counts, content formats,  and the type of partnership. I think if you're a company  like Meta or Google, the revenue might not be  there simply because it's
    (12:06) the newer format and you're  already doing advertising advertisements against your  existing format. So as you introduce a new  product, essentially, you know,  you really got to get advertisers to learn the new  offering, figure out how to do it. But then at the same time  you're cannibalizing your
    (12:22) other offerings,  right? So there's a transition  period. Meta. They talk about this a  lot. And, you know,  they've gone through these cycles at various times in  their history. When TikTok faced a  potential ban in the U.S., competitors quickly seized  the moment. We saw some of this already  during the brief shutdown in
    (12:40) January, when there were  creators taking to Instagram and a surge in engagement on  both shorts and reels. Meta and YouTube would bring  in about 50% of all reallocated TikTok ad  dollars in the US if TikTok were to be banned this year. Even with these numbers,  short form video revenue still lags behind long form  content.
    (13:02) I would say that it's  tougher to to earn money if you're creating content  that's under a minute now because YouTube rewards,  you know, long form videos. They still reward for  shorts, obviously, but the, you know, most money to be  made on YouTube is with longer videos. Um,  and now it's the same case
    (13:18) with TikTok. With ad limitations,  shifting algorithms and growing scrutiny from  lawmakers, the future of short videos  is still uncertain. Platforms are betting on  e-commerce and AI driven recommendations to stay  ahead. But as engagement skyrockets  and attention spans shrink, one question remains is  short form video evolving
    (13:37) social media or just  reshaping how we consume content, for better or  worse? So it certainly feels like,  at least anecdotally, it does feel like it's  affected people's attention span. In many ways,  it's like Pandora's box and it's been opened. You can't, you know, exactly put it  back in. Right. So this is where  we're at.
    (13:54) And a lot of people love,  you know, social media. And this is  just kind of like the format of choice at the moment.

https://youtube.com/watch?v=xep-5zG5KaI&si=yl1ACc4J_ObCkNJc

(54) Why You Are Getting So Many Fake Job Offers By Text - YouTube
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=xep-5zG5KaI

(00:00) Have you ever received a  text message like this offering you a job? Hi, I'm Emily from Robert  Half International Recruitment. We have an  opening position for part time and full time jobs. Can I share you details with  you? Salaries range from $200 to  $800 per day. If you are interested in  this opportunity, please
(00:20) send a text message to  (347) 725-7663. On September 13th,  2024, Sunita Dhougoda, a 37 year old freelance  software engineer from North Carolina, received one two  without much thought. The mother of two clicked  the Microsoft Teams link. I was expecting a video  interview on teams, but surprisingly it was a  text interview and it was
(00:42) more than an hour long  interview went well and they told me that they will get  back to me in few days. Three days later,  an offer letter landed in her inbox, but something  felt off. I researched on the company  website. The biggest red flag she  spotted was the scammers Scammer's email. Careers at  Azure Care careers which
(01:03) they use to communicate  instead of the legitimate at a sharecare.com. I found like it was a scam,  so I never responded back. Dhougoda was fortunate not  to fall for the scam, but many others have lost  millions to similar cons. We've seen a huge increase  in text job scams. We received over 9000  reports in 2023,
(01:25) but more than 20,000 in  2024. Consumers reported losing  $14.8 million in 2023, and that shot up to $61.2  million in 2024. And the worrying thing is  that we know these high numbers are just the tip of  the iceberg, because of course,  not everyone reports to us when they experience this  fraud. Here's why job scams are  filling up your text
(01:51) messages and how to protect  yourself. Emails, phone calls and  texts are scammers. Top three contact methods  job scams via text have seen a sharp rise in reports and  financial losses. In 2020, 4872 reports of job  scams via text resulted in $2 million in losses,  but by 2024, those reports climbed to  20,632,
(02:19) with losses escalating to  $61.2 million. The immediate response  driven nature and accessibility of texting has  made it a preferred tool for scammers. It usually takes  people around 90 minutes to open an email,  but with SMS, users open the message  within 90s. So I think it's easy to  communicate through the text
(02:40) rather than the call and the  emails. So that's the reason they  are doing the text messages for the people who are  thinking the job. Anything that is immediate,  you're hardwired to respond to it. So a text has a  certain amount of immediacy to it. So you see that and  you go, oh, I need to either click  on that link or I need to
(02:58) call that phone number,  whatever it is that it's asking you to do. We're just  sort of natural instinct is to do that, which is why  it's important we resist that natural instinct. I have noticed that email  scams have been around for a very long time,  and we're somewhat accustomed to being  concerned when we get an
(03:15) unexpected email. But many of us,  myself included, are using text messages to  communicate all day long, and we may be working  quickly. And so if you get a text  message, it can be a moment where you  quickly read it and respond to it. The FTC has also warned  about the rise of a particular job scam,  called a task scam,
(03:37) which is depleting people's  bank accounts. These are scams that often  start with a text message about online work. And when consumers respond  to this, they're told they'll be  completing tasks related to things like app optimization  or product boosting or something like that. And people really do  actually start doing tasks,
(03:59) and they may see some small  payouts at the beginning from this supposed job,  but over time, they are asked to pay money  to complete the next series of tasks. And so at the end  of the day, consumers end up losing a  lot of money to these scams. And we have seen a really  concerning increase in the
(04:19) last four years. There were zero of them in  2020, then 5000 reported in 2023,  and that quadrupled to about 20,000 just in the first  half of 2024. So we want everyone to be  aware, to stay away from these  unexpected text messages about jobs. These task scams seem to  offer us a low effort but high reward kind of gig.
(04:46) And so people go,  yeah, I can do two jobs, I can do three jobs. I'll do  that. That's easy. So it's playing  to the nature that we have of I can do more than what  I'm doing. And so you've got the people  who are employment insecure and the people who are like, gig oriented. And it all  comes together to create an
(05:03) environment where people are  likely to click on these kinds of links. One thing we've seen over  many, many years at the Federal  Trade Commission is that the scammers follow the  headlines. So whatever's going on in  the world, scammers are going to try to  use that to steal people's money. To announce layoff in  February,
(05:23) surging by 245% to the  highest level since the pandemic. With the Trump  administration's efforts to reduce the federal workforce  playing not the only but the biggest. If you've been following the  news job cuts across the federal government,  the nation's largest employer, continue to draw  widespread attention.
(05:41) Despite this massive wave of  cuts, the Federal Reserve says the  overall labor market remains balanced. The layoffs that are  happening here are you know, they're certainly meaningful  to the people involved, and they may be meaningful to a  particular neighborhood or region or area. But at the national level,  they're not they're not
(05:58) significant yet. Powell's comments on the  overall labor market were reflected in the latest job  reports as well. Despite the unemployment  rate ticking up to 4.2% in March, the US economy added  a stronger than expected 228,000 jobs. That's up from  a revised 117,000in February and above the Dow Jones  estimate of 140,000.
(06:18) So overall, the economy is  still growing and the job market does remain solid. Unemployment is low. We are still adding jobs. However, that doesn't  necessarily mean it's a good job market for everyone. We've seen hiring slow over  the last two and a half years since about 2022. So as a result,  it is more difficult to find
(06:37) a job. The number of  applicants per job on LinkedIn is up 70% compared  to 2022. Looking at 2024. Had a full time job as a  senior software engineer I got laid off on 2023,  so since then I have been working as a freelance. But the job market is really  very bad. It's really very tough to  get the job.
(06:58) Dalgoda isn't alone in that  sentiment. Workers confidence in  finding or keeping a job is at its lowest point on  record, surpassing even the levels  seen in spring of 2020. Now that the labor market is  more competitive, people may be willing to  take jobs that they weren't necessarily willing to take  before.
(07:13) As a result, there may be  some advertisements that they received that they  would have previously ignored, that they're  willing to click on. Folks who are looking to commit  scams, know this, and they may be taking  advantage of that. As a result. Many people are always  interested in finding a job
(07:27) or finding a side gig for  extra income. And so scammers are using  that desire to try to steal people's money and personal  information. Government agencies like the  FBI and FTC are issuing consumer alerts on how to  protect yourself. The FTC wants people to know  that text based job scams are a huge problem.
(07:48) People are losing money and  you should protect yourself by never interacting with an  unexpected text message about a job. Real employers  will never contact you that way. If you get an unsolicited  text or an unsolicited email or phone call,  ignore it, just delete it. And the wonderful thing now  that we see with our
(08:08) smartphones is all of the  telecom carriers give you the option to report that as  some kind of spam or malware or something. So you should  not only delete it, but also report it,  because that helps both the telecom companies and the  operators of your smartphone to understand what's  happening. And they can then help block  that.
(08:28) If someone does think  they've been the victim of a text based job scam,  they should consider doing a couple of things. One is report it to the FTC  at report fraud. This is the large database  that we and other law enforcers use every day to  help address scams. And if people are worried  that they've been the victim
(08:52) of identity theft,  they should visit identitytheft.gov. There are a few ways that  you can try to protect yourself from job scams on  LinkedIn. Look for verification  badges. We verify whether the  employer's information is true and correct. Second, filter jobs that  have been verified so that you're getting the most  credible set of job
(09:12) postings. Also,  you can turn on warning messages on LinkedIn for  harmful content, and that will help you  filter out some of this noise. When we fall victim to these  things, we do feel very guilty. We feel ashamed. We feel like,  wait a minute, I'm smarter than this. I shouldn't fall  for this. But the reality is,  these scams are very
(09:32) sophisticated. These people  who do this are very well organized. And now they have  artificial intelligence to help. So the tools they are  using create letter perfect websites. We don't see texts  anymore that have grammar problems and spelling  problems, and the pitch itself is very  compelling. That's all because of  artificial intelligence,
(09:53) so people shouldn't feel bad  about this. Use your social media to  tell other people about what happened. If you happen to  have screenshot of that text that you fell for,  post it. Show people what's  happening. Let other people know to be  aware and to avoid that thing that you fell into. And even if you didn't fall  into it,
(10:13) still tell people you should  be on the lookout for this. It's fraud. It's fake. Don't click on the link.  Don't return the phone call. They are 99.99% of the time, fake and fraudulent. And it's going to make your  life very difficult to recover from.

https://youtu.be/QqDqNl6OJZE?si=RpaNBWKa4ydEBABM

https://youtube.com/watch?v=InkRhrFK94k&si=zPENZkbgJOuSCET1

https://youtube.com/watch?v=B2KrT0FAH-k&si=uueBcbbad4kXuw4a

https://youtube.com/watch?v=quGoGgbP-aE&si=1uhWeItDRITZR5Or

https://youtube.com/watch?v=JuwK-vvvYgY&si=xBDzbc3cC4d_qdIZ

https://youtube.com/watch?v=mJG4MdepNSA&si=qlWJWXf2ewi686ux

https://youtube.com/watch?v=aatEQRJK6ms&si=_2m0M8UZw8fXlips

https://youtube.com/watch?v=ECY7txi92dc&si=qlV06TfxUw3THByX

https://youtube.com/watch?v=pWzstvXQ7l8&si=y7iPMTOdzeGgOdqc

